lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_g-w-ghw.txt
^[All.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnun      PostInflII; ^[All.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnun      PostInflII; ^[All.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemnun    PostInflII;
^[All.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnnun     PostInflII; ^[All.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnnun     PostInflII; ^[All.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemnnun   PostInflII;
^[All.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegnun   PostInflII; ^[All.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegnun   PostInflII; ^[All.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegnun PostInflII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpenun    PostInflII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpenun    PostInflII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpenun    PostInflII;
^[All.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegnun   PostInflII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegnun   PostInflII; ^[All.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpegnun   PostInflII;
^[All.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesinun  PostInflII; ^[All.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesinun  PostInflII; ^[All.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesinun  PostInflII;
^[All.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnun PostInflII; ^[All.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnun PostInflII; ^[All.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegnun PostInflII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[All.3SgPoss.Sg]:^anun             PostInflII; ^[All.3SgPoss.Pl]:^anun             PostInflII; ^[All.3SgPoss.Du]:^egkenun    PostInflII;
^[All.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itnun            PostInflII; ^[All.3PlPoss.Pl]:^itnun            PostInflII; ^[All.3PlPoss.Du]:^itnun      PostInflII;
^[All.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egkenun          PostInflII; ^[All.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itnun            PostInflII; ^[All.3DuPoss.Du]:^itnun      PostInflII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[All.4SgPoss.Sg]:^minun            PostInflII; ^[All.4SgPoss.Pl]:^minun            PostInflII; ^[All.4SgPoss.Du]:^egminun    PostInflII;
^[All.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggnun          PostInflII; ^[All.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggnun          PostInflII; ^[All.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmeggnun  PostInflII;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megnun           PostInflII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megnun           PostInflII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegnun   PostInflII;
^[All.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megtenun         PostInflII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megtenun         PostInflII; ^[All.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegtenun PostInflII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|

!-----------------------------------------------|
!             PERLATIVE (vialis)                |
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.Sg]:^kun                        PostInflII; ^[Prl.Pl]:^etgun                      PostInflII; ^[Prl.Du]:^egnekun               PostInflII;
                                                  ^[Prl.Pl]:^teggun                     PostInflII;                                            |
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mkun        PostInflII; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mkun        PostInflII; ^[Prl.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemkun       PostInflII;
^[Prl.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mteggun     PostInflII; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mteggun     PostInflII; ^[Prl.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemteggun    PostInflII;
^[Prl.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegun   PostInflII; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegnegun   PostInflII; ^[Prl.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegnegun  PostInflII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegun      PostInflII; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegun      PostInflII; ^[Prl.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpegun       PostInflII;
^[Prl.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesigun    PostInflII; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesigun    PostInflII; ^[Prl.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesigun     PostInflII;
^[Prl.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun PostInflII; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegnegun PostInflII; ^[Prl.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegnegun  PostInflII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.3SgPoss.Sg]:^akun               PostInflII; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Pl]:^akun               PostInflII; ^[Prl.3SgPoss.Du]:^egkenkun      PostInflII;
^[Prl.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itgun              PostInflII; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Pl]:^itgun              PostInflII; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^itgun         PostInflII;
^[Prl.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egkenkun           PostInflII; ^[Prl.3DuPoss.Pl]:^akun               PostInflII; ^[Prl.3PlPoss.Du]:^itgun         PostInflII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|
^[Prl.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mikun              PostInflII; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mikun              PostInflII; ^[Prl.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmikun       PostInflII;
^[Prl.4PlPoss.Sg]:^megteggun          PostInflII; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Pl]:^megteggun          PostInflII; ^[Prl.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmegteggun   PostInflII;
^[Prl.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megtegnegun        PostInflII; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megtegnegun        PostInflII; ^[Prl.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegtegnegun PostInflII;
!-----------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|

!----------------------------------------------|
!              EQUATIVE (equalis)              |
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.Sg]:^tun                       PostInflII; ^[Equ.Pl]:^estun                     PostInflII; ^[Equ.Du]:^egestun              PostInflII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtun       PostInflII; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtun       PostInflII; ^[Equ.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemtun      PostInflII;
^[Equ.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtestun    PostInflII; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtestun    PostInflII; ^[Equ.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemtestun   PostInflII;
^[Equ.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegestun  PostInflII; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegestun  PostInflII; ^[Equ.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegestun PostInflII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetun     PostInflII; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetun     PostInflII; ^[Equ.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpetun      PostInflII;
^[Equ.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesistun  PostInflII; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesistun  PostInflII; ^[Equ.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesistun   PostInflII;
^[Equ.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegetun PostInflII; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegetun PostInflII; ^[Equ.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegetun  PostInflII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.3SgPoss.Sg]:^atun              PostInflII; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Pl]:^atun              PostInflII; ^[Equ.3SgPoss.Du]:^egketun      PostInflII;
^[Equ.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itun              PostInflII; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Pl]:^itun              PostInflII; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^itun         PostInflII;
^[Equ.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egketun           PostInflII; ^[Equ.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itun              PostInflII; ^[Equ.3PlPoss.Du]:^itun         PostInflII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|
^[Equ.4SgPoss.Sg]:^mitun             PostInflII; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Pl]:^mitun             PostInflII; ^[Equ.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmitun      PostInflII;
^[Equ.4PlPoss.Sg]:^megestun          PostInflII; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Pl]:^megestun          PostInflII; ^[Equ.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmegestun   PostInflII;
^[Equ.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megestun          PostInflII; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megestun          PostInflII; ^[Equ.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegestun   PostInflII;
!----------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|

!--------------------------------------------|
! Obsolete Verb Root -ete                    |
!   ^[Jacobson (2001) p.78]                  |
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^m                      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Pl]:^n                      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.Du]:^egn              VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mn      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mn      VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^egemn    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnn     VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^egemnn   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^egemtegn VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpen    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpen    VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpen    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegn   VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^egpegn   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesin  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesin  VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^egpesin  VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegn VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^egpetegn VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^an             VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^an             VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^egken    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^itn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^itn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^itn      VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^egken          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^itn            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^itn      VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^min            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^min            VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^egmin    VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^meggn          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^meggn          VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^egmeggn  VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megn           VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megn           VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegn   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^megten         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^megten         VerbRootEte; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^egmegten VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
